Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-3704
Memorandum of understanding; duties; report.

(1) The Department of Labor shall execute a memorandum of understanding with the Nebraska Statewide Workforce and Education Reporting System before December 31, 2020, to ensure the exchange of available Department of Labor data throughout the prekindergarten to postsecondary education to workforce continuum, and may utilize data and agreements under sections 79-776, 85-110, 85-309, and 85-1511.

(2) On or before December 1, 2022, and on or before each December 1 thereafter, the Nebraska Statewide Workforce and Education Reporting System shall issue a report electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature and the Governor. Such report shall provide an overview of research and analysis conducted, additional data needs for future analysis, and organizational structure and needs.

Laws 2020, LB1160, § 4;

Laws 2022, LB1130, § 1.